Washington statutes.
RCW 14.08.090

Issuance of bonds—Security.

Any bonds to be issued by any municipality pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be authorized and issued in the manner and within the limitation prescribed by the Constitution and laws of this state or the charter of the municipality for the issuance and authorization of bonds thereof for public purposes generally, secured by the revenues of the airport, a mortgage on facilities, or a general tax levy as allowed by law, if the plan and system resolution are approved by the secretary of transportation or the state auditor.

[ 1995 c 301 s 32; 1984 c 7 s 4; 1945 c 182 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2722-35.]

NOTES:

Levy of taxes: Chapter 84.52 RCW.

Public contracts and indebtedness: Title 39 RCW.